Utah statutes.
32A-5-110 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Information obtained by investigator.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Investigator" means an individual who is:

(i) (A)  an auditor or inspector; and

(B)  employed by the department; or

(ii) (A)  a peace officer, examiner, or investigator; and

(B)  employed by a nondepartment enforcement agency.

(b)  "Nondepartment enforcement agency" means an agency that:

(i) (A)  is a state agency other than the department; or

(B)  is an agency of a county, city, or town; and

(ii)  has a responsibility, as provided in another provision of this title, to enforce one or more provisions of this title.

(c) (i)  "Record" means information that is:

(A)  inscribed on a tangible medium; or

(B)  stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(ii)  "Record" includes:

(A)  book;

(B)  book of account;

(C)  paper;

(D)  contract;

(E)  agreement;

(F)  document; or

(G)  recording in any medium.

(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), if an investigator is permitted by another provision of this chapter to inspect a book or record of a club licensee, in addition to any other rights under this title, the investigator may inspect, have a copy of, or otherwise review any record of the club licensee that is a visual recording of the operations of the club licensee.

(b)  An investigator who is a peace officer may not inspect, have a copy of, or otherwise review a visual recording described in Subsection (2)(a) without probable cause.

